Hawaii statutes.
§329-63 Person required to keep records and
file reports. (a) Any manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or other person
who sells, transfers, receives, or brings in from outside the State, or
otherwise furnishes a substance specified in section 329-61, or an
encapsulating or tableting machine shall keep a record of each transaction for
a period of two years after the date of transaction.

(b) Any manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, or
other person who sells, transfers, receives, or brings in from outside the
State, or otherwise furnishes a substance specified in section 329-61, for use
by a person in this State shall report to the administrator the following:

(1) Any regulated transaction involving:

(A) An above threshold quantity;

(B) Any suspicious or out-of-the-ordinary
quantity of a chemical listed in [section] 329-61;

(C) An uncommon method of payment or
delivery; or

(D) Any other circumstances that the
regulated person believes may indicate that the regulated chemical will be used
in violation of this part;

(2) Any proposed regulated transaction with a person
whose description or other identifying characteristics the department has
previously furnished to the regulated person;

(3) Any unusual or excessive loss or disappearance of
a regulated chemical listed under section 329-61 that is under the control of
the regulated person, to include exempted items. The regulated person
responsible for reporting a loss in-transit is the supplier;

(4) Any regulated transaction of a tableting machine
or an encapsulating machine; and

(5) All single entity ephedrine transactions.

(c) The department of public safety shall
provide a common reporting form for the substances in section 329-61 that
contains at least the following information:

(1) Name of the substance;

(2) Quantity of the substance sold, transferred, or
furnished;

(3) The date the substance was sold, transferred, or
furnished;

(4) The name and address of the person buying or
receiving the substance; and

(5) The name and address of the manufacturer,
wholesaler, retailer, or other person selling, transferring, or furnishing such
substance.

(d) Each report submitted pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section, whenever possible, shall be made orally to the
department at the earliest practicable opportunity after the regulated person
becomes aware of the circumstances involved and as much in advance of the
conclusion of the transaction as possible. A written report shall also be
submitted to the department following an oral report. [L 1990, c 200, pt of §1;
am L 1999, c 252, §9]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next